Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-314
Board of trustees; rules and regulations.

The board shall adopt all needful rules and regulations for the careful preservation of the buildings, furniture, apparatus, grounds, timber, shrubbery, and other property belonging to the state college.

Laws 1881, c. 78, sub. XIII, § 7, p. 374;

R.S.1913, § 7063;

C.S.1922, § 6698;

C.S.1929, § 85-307;

R.S.1943, § 85-314;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 10, p. 3202.